Illinois, session 104th, HB2357.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Demonstrations Law is 5amended by changing Sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8 as 6follows: 7    (430 ILCS 70/2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 85-2)8    Sec. 2. Declaration of purpose. 9    (a) It is declared to be the public policy of this State: 10    That the maintenance of good order on highways, as defined 11in Section 2-202 of the "Illinois Highway Code", is a 12paramount responsibility of democratic government;13    That the public health, welfare and safety of the 14community require that the movement of vehicular traffic on 15such roadways be lawfully conducted with a minimum of 16disruption;17    That the practice of unhindered or unrestrained picketing 18or demonstrating on such roadways has caused disruption of 19police, fire and emergency services, and injury to persons 20regardless of participation in the march, assembly or 21demonstration;22    That the practice of multiple demonstrations on the same 23day in different locations in municipalities and   HB2357- 2 -LRB104 06152 BDA 16186 b1unincorporated areas of counties has unreasonably deprived the 2citizens of the police, fire and emergency services; and3    That the provisions herein enacted are necessary for the 4protection of the health, welfare and safety of the public.5    (b) It is further declared to be the public policy of this 6State:7    That the changing technological circumstances since the 8declaration of purpose in subsection (a), including the use of 9the internet and smart phones to quickly organize disruptive 10blockages of the highways, further necessitate the provisions 11of this Act.12    That the obstruction of peace officers, firefighters, and 13emergency medical services by disruptive blockages of the 14highways continues to endanger the health, welfare, and safety 15of the public.16    That the provisions in this Act continue to be necessary 17for the protection of the health, welfare, and safety of the 18public. 19(Source: P.A. 81-840.) 20    (430 ILCS 70/3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 85-3)21    Sec. 3. Unlawful action-Parade permit. It is unlawful for 22any person, group or organization to conduct or participate in 23any march, assembly, meeting, parade, or gathering on roadways 24in more than one specific area of or location in, any 25municipality or the unincorporated area of a county, on any   HB2357- 3 -LRB104 06152 BDA 16186 b1given day, unless it is acting under authority of a duly issued 2municipal or county parade or demonstration permit if local 3ordinance or regulation requires a permit, or, if not, with 4permission of the sheriff of the county where the march, 5assembly, meeting, parade, or gathering on roadways originates 6principal law enforcement officer for the area. Only the 7person, group, or organization responsible for organizing the 8march, assembly, meeting, parade, or gathering is required to 9obtain a permit or the permission of the sheriff principal law 10enforcement officer, which shall be sufficient to encompass 11all participants. If a march, assembly, meeting, parade, or 12gathering on roadways involves the act of crossing or 13traversing over or upon active railroad tracks, the municipal 14or county authority or sheriff principal law enforcement 15officer, as part of its permit or permission process, may 16prohibit any portion of the route that involves the act of 17crossing or traversing over or upon active railroad tracks. If 18permission is requested from the sheriff of the county where 19the march, assembly, meeting, parade, or gathering on roadways 20originates under this Section, it is the responsibility of the 21sheriff to coordinate with other law enforcement agencies in 22other jurisdictions as necessary. It is not the responsibility 23of the requester to make another request. 24(Source: P.A. 98-320, eff. 8-12-13.) 25    (430 ILCS 70/4)  (from Ch. 38, par. 85-4)  HB2357- 4 -LRB104 06152 BDA 16186 b1    Sec. 4. Acting with other groups - Size of assemblage. It 2is unlawful for any group or organization or any individual 3acting with the group or organization, to conduct or 4participate in any march, assembly, meeting, parade, or 5gathering on roadways unless the march, assembly, meeting, 6parade, or gathering is limited to numbers that, in the 7opinion of the sheriff of the county where the march, 8assembly, meeting, parade, or gathering on roadways originates 9principal law enforcement officer, will not obstruct 10pedestrian or vehicular traffic in an unreasonable manner. The 11sheriff principal law enforcement officer shall, within 12 12hours of receiving the notice required by Section 5, inform 13the group or organization as to the limitation on number of 14persons allowed to participate. If permission is requested 15from the sheriff of the county where the march, assembly, 16meeting, parade, or gathering on roadways originates under 17this Section, it is the responsibility of the sheriff to 18coordinate with other law enforcement agencies in other 19jurisdictions as necessary. It is not the responsibility of 20the requester to make another request. 21(Source: P.A. 98-320, eff. 8-12-13.) 22    (430 ILCS 70/5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 85-5)23    Sec. 5. Notice of assemblage in writing-Contents. It is 24unlawful for any group or organization to conduct or 25participate in any march, assembly, meeting, parade, or   HB2357- 5 -LRB104 06152 BDA 16186 b1gathering on roadways unless the sheriff of the county where 2the march, assembly, meeting, parade, or gathering on roadways 3originates principal law enforcement officer has been given 4notice in writing of the location, the maximum number of 5persons participating, and the names and addresses of the 6organizers of the march, assembly, meeting, parade, or 7gathering, its route, and its time of inception and duration 8at least 24 hours before inception. If permission is requested 9from or notice is provided to the sheriff of the county where 10the march, assembly, meeting, parade, or gathering on roadways 11originates under this Section, it is the responsibility of the 12sheriff to coordinate with other law enforcement agencies in 13other jurisdictions as necessary. It is not the responsibility 14of the requester to make another request or give another 15notice. No act of notification to law enforcement is a defense 16to subsection (b) of Section 8 of this Act. 17(Source: P.A. 98-320, eff. 8-12-13.) 18    (430 ILCS 70/6)  (from Ch. 38, par. 85-6)19    Sec. 6. Time of holding. It is unlawful for any group, 20organization, or any individual to conduct or participate in 21any march, assembly, meeting, parade, or gathering on roadways 22during peak traffic periods unless authorized by the sheriff 23of the county where the march, assembly, meeting, parade, or 24gathering on roadways originates principal law enforcement 25officer for the area in which the march, assembly, meeting,   HB2357- 6 -LRB104 06152 BDA 16186 b1parade, or gathering is to be held. Peak traffic periods, 2unless otherwise set by municipal or county authority, are for 3the purposes of this Act declared to be 7:30 a.m. o'clock to 49:00 a.m. o'clock in the forenoon, and from 4:30 p.m. o'clock 5to 6:00 p.m. o'clock in the afternoon, Monday through Friday 6except for State and National holidays. If permission is 7requested from the sheriff of the county where the march, 8assembly, meeting, parade, or gathering on roadways originates 9under this Section, it is the responsibility of the sheriff to 10coordinate with other law enforcement agencies in other 11jurisdictions as necessary. It is not the responsibility of 12the requester to make another request. No act or circumstance 13of scheduling or time is a defense to subsection (b) of Section 148 of this Act. 15(Source: P.A. 98-320, eff. 8-12-13.) 16    (430 ILCS 70/7)  (from Ch. 38, par. 85-7)17    Sec. 7. Conflict with municipal ordinance; home rule. 18    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to invalidate 19or repeal by inference any local or municipal enactment in 20regard to parades or demonstrations, but if there is an 21unreconcilable conflict this Act shall prevail as to such 22portion or portions that are in direct conflict, except as to 23duly designated peak hours of traffic within its boundaries.24    (b) A home rule unit may not regulate public 25demonstrations in a manner inconsistent with the regulation by   HB2357- 7 -LRB104 06152 BDA 16186 b1the State of public demonstrations under this Act. This 2Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 3Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 4exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 5by the State. 6(Source: Laws 1967, p. 3613.) 7    (430 ILCS 70/8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 85-8)8    Sec. 8. Sentence. 9    (a) Violation of this Act, except as provided in 10subsection (b), is a Class A misdemeanor.11    (b) A person who blocks an exceptionally busy public 12right-of-way for any period of not less than 5 minutes in a 13manner that prevents, or would prevent, the free passage of a 14peace officer, a firefighter, or an emergency medical services 15personnel responder, irrespective of the time of day or notice 16provided, commits a Class 4 felony.17    (c) As used in this Section, "exceptionally busy public 18right-of-way" means a public right-of-way that, based on 19statistics gathered by the Illinois Department of 20Transportation or the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority, 21under typical conditions carries at least 24,000 separate 22motor vehicle movements in any 24-hour period. 23(Source: P.A. 77-2646.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.